Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.040

Money collected under chapter—Placement—Disbursement.

All money collected under this chapter shall be placed in an account in the agricultural local fund. Money in the account shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter and may be used for apiary-related activities of the department or funding research projects of benefit to the apiary industry that the director may select upon the advice of the apiary advisory committee. No appropriation is required for disbursement from the account.

[ 2000 c 100 s 5; 1994 c 178 s 4; 1993 c 89 s 8; 1988 c 4 s 6; 1981 c 296 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 362 s 4; 1961 c 11 s 15.60.040. Prior: 1959 c 174 s 1; 1955 c 271 s 6; prior: (i) 1949 c 105 s 2; 1933 ex.s. c 59 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3170-3. (ii) 1933 ex.s. c 59 s 4; RRS s 3170-4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.